Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1144.
do enact as follows:SB1144,11Section 1. 20.490 (7) of the statutes is created to read:SB1144,2,5220.490 (7) Mobile homes and manufactured homes. (a) Grants for mobile 3homes and manufactured homes. All moneys received under s. 710.15 (5w) for the 4purposes of awarding grants to owners of mobile or manufactured home 5communities and owners of mobile homes or manufactured homes.SB1144,26Section 2. 234.47 of the statutes is created to read:SB1144,2,87234.47 Mobile homes and manufactured homes. (1) Definitions. In 8this section:SB1144,2,99(a) “Manufactured home” has the meaning given in s. 101.91 (2).SB1144,2,1110(b) “Mobile home” has the meaning given in s. 101.91 (10), but does not 11include a recreational vehicle, as defined in s. 340.01 (48r).SB1144,2,1312(c) “Mobile or manufactured home community” has the meaning given for 13“community” in s. 710.15 (1) (ad).SB1144,2,1814(2) Grants. (a) The authority may provide grants to owners of mobile or 15manufactured home communities for the purpose of bringing the mobile or 16manufactured home communities into compliance with licensing standards. The 17authority may also provide grants to owners of mobile homes or manufactured 18homes for the purpose of repairing, renovating, and improving such homes.SB1144,319Section 3. 710.15 (5w) of the statutes is created to read:SB1144,3,920710.15 (5w) Penalties. (a) Any community owner who violates a 1requirement under this section, including a reporting requirement, may be subject 2to a $5,000 forfeiture for each year, or part thereof, in which the community owner 3is in violation of a requirement under this section. The department of safety and 4professional services shall impose and collect the forfeitures under this subsection. 5An unpaid forfeiture under this subsection and any unpaid assessments and fees 6owed by the community owner creates a lien that continues until released and 7discharged by the department. Forfeitures paid under this subsection shall be 8credited to the appropriation under s. 20.490 (7) (a) to be used for the purposes 9under s. 234.47.SB1144,3,1010